Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Child Support Recovery

205.710.
Definitions for KRS 205.712 to 205.800.

As used in KRS 205.712 to 205.800, unless the context clearly dictates otherwise:

“Cabinet” shall mean the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

“Secretary” shall mean the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

“Court order” shall mean any judgment, decree, or order of the courts of this state or any other state. For the purposes of KRS 205.715 to 205.800, 403.215, 405.405 to 405.520, and 530.050, it shall also include an order of an authorized administrative body;

“Dependent child” or “needy dependent child” shall mean any person under the age of eighteen (18), or under the age of nineteen (19) if in high school, who is not otherwise emancipated, self-supporting, married, or a member of the Armed Forces of the United States and is a recipient of or applicant for services under Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act;

“Duty of support” shall mean any duty of support imposed or imposable by law or by court order, decree, or judgment, whether interlocutory or final, and includes the duty to pay spousal support that applies to spouses with a child even if child support is not part of the order or when spousal support is assigned to the cabinet and arrearages of support past due and unpaid in addition to medical support whenever health-care coverage is available at a reasonable cost;

“Recipient” shall mean a relative or payee within the meaning of the Social Security Act and federal and state regulations who is receiving public assistance on behalf of a needy dependent child;

“Consumer reporting agency” means any person or organization which, for monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in whole or in part in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing consumer reports to third parties, and which uses any means or facility of interstate commerce for the purpose of preparing or furnishing consumer reports;

“Obligor” means a parent who has an obligation to provide support;

“Employer” means any individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, association, or private or public corporation, the United States or any federal agency, this state or any political subdivision of this state, any other state or a political subdivision of another state, or any other legal entity which hires and pays an individual for his services;

“Income” means but is not limited to any of the following:

Commissions, bonuses, workers’ compensation awards attributable to lost wages, retirement and pensions, interest and disability, earnings, salaries, wages, and other income due or to be due in the future from a person’s employer and successor employers;

Any payment due or to be due in the future from a profit-sharing plan, pension plan, insurance contract, annuity, Social Security, proceeds derived from state lottery winnings, unemployment compensation, supplemental unemployment benefits, and workers’ compensation; and

Any amount of money which is due to the obligor under a support order as a debt of any other individual, partnership, association, or private or public corporation, the United States or any federal agency, this state or any political subdivision of this state, any other state or a political subdivision of another state, or any other legal entity which is indebted to the obligor;

“Earnings” means compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise, and notwithstanding any other provision of law exempting such payments from garnishment, attachment, or other process to satisfy support obligations and specifically includes periodic payments from pension and retirement programs and insurance policies of any kind. Earnings shall include all gain derived from capital, from labor, or both, including profit gained through sale or conversion of capital assets and unemployment compensation benefits, or any other form of monetary gain. The term “disposable earnings” means that part of earnings remaining after deductions of any amounts required by law to be withheld;

“Enforce” means to employ any judicial or administrative remedy under KRS 405.405 to 405.420 and KRS 405.991(2) or under any other Kentucky law;

“Need” includes, but is not limited to, the necessary cost of food, clothing, shelter, and medical care. The amount determined under the suggested minimum support obligation scale shall be rebuttably presumed to correspond to the parent’s ability to pay and the need of the child. A parent shall be presumed to be unable to pay child support from any income received from public assistance under Title IV-A of the Social Security Act, or other continuing public assistance;

“Parent” means a biological or adoptive mother or father of a child born in wedlock or a father of a child born out of wedlock if paternity has been established in a judicial proceeding or in any manner consistent with the laws of this or any other state, whose child is entitled to support, pursuant to court order, statute, or administrative determination; and

“Real and personal property” includes all property of all kinds, including but not limited to, all gain derived from capital, labor, or both; compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise; periodic payments from pension and retirement programs; and unemployment compensation and insurance policies.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 343, § 2; 1986, ch. 487, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 411, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 330, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 365, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 100, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 255, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 219, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 265, effective June 20, 2005.

205.712.
Department for Income Support — Duties — Cabinet to process child support payments — State disbursement unit — Cabinet’s cooperation with courts and officials — Reporting of obligors — Denial, suspension, and revocation of licenses — Data match system — Subpoenas — Distribution of child support program information.

The Department for Income Support, Child Support Enforcement, is established in the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

The duties of the Department for Income Support, Child Support Enforcement, or its designee, shall include:

Serve as state agency authorized to administer Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. secs. 651 to 669;

Serve as the information agency as provided in the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, KRS Chapter 407;

Serve as collector of all court-ordered or administratively ordered child support payments pursuant to Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act;

Serve as the agent for enforcement of international child support obligations, and respond to requests from foreign reciprocating countries;

Establish and enforce an obligation upon receipt of a completed, notarized voluntary acknowledgment-of-paternity form;

Enforce Kentucky child support laws, including collection of court-ordered or administratively ordered child support arrearages and prosecution of persons who fail to pay child support;

Publicize the availability of services and encourage the use of these services for establishing paternity and child support;

Pay the cost of genetic testing to establish paternity, subject to recoupment from the alleged father, when paternity is administratively or judicially determined; and obtain additional testing when an original test is contested, upon request and advance payment by the contestant;

Establish child support obligations and seek modification of judicially or administratively established child support obligations in accordance with the child support guidelines of the Commonwealth of Kentucky as provided under KRS 403.212;

Administratively establish child support orders which shall have the same force and effect of law;

Issue an administrative subpoena to secure public and private records of utility and cable companies and asset and liability information from financial institutions for the establishment, modification, or enforcement of a child support obligation;

Impose a penalty for failure to comply with an administrative subpoena;

Provide notices, copies of proceedings, and determinations of support amounts to any parties or individuals who are applying for or receiving Title IV-D services, or who are parties to cases in which Title IV-D services are being provided; and

Issue interstate administrative subpoenas to any individual or entity for financial or other information or documents which are needed to establish, modify, or enforce a child support obligation pursuant to Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. secs. 651 et seq. An administrative subpoena lawfully issued in another state to an individual or entity residing in this state shall be honored and enforced in the Circuit Court where the individual or entity resides.

The Department for Income Support, Child Support Enforcement, or its designee may promulgate administrative regulations to implement this section and adopt forms or implement other requirements of federal law relating to interstate administrative subpoenas, and may amend forms by technical amendment that are mandated by the federal Office of Child Support Enforcement and incorporated by reference in administrative regulation.

Effective September 30, 1999, the cabinet shall establish a system to receive and process all child support payments. The system shall include existing computer systems to record the payments. The automated system shall include a state case registry that contains records with respect to each case in which services are being provided by the cabinet and each child support order established or modified in the state on or after October 1, 1998.

The cabinet shall establish and operate a state disbursement unit for the collection, disbursement, and recording of payments under support orders for all Title IV-D cases and for all cases initially issued in the state on or after January 1, 1994, in which a wage withholding has been court-ordered or administratively ordered, pursuant to Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act. Establishment of the state unit may include the designation and continuation of existing local collection units to aid efficient and effective collection, disbursement, and recording of child support payments.

After the establishment of the disbursement unit child support collection system, the cabinet or its designee shall serve as collector of all court-ordered or administratively ordered child support payments pursuant to Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act.

Where establishment of paternity and enforcement and collection of child support is by law the responsibility of local officials, the cabinet shall refer cases to the appropriate official for such action. The cabinet may enter into cooperative arrangements with appropriate courts and law enforcement officials to assist the cabinet in administering the program of child support recovery, including the entering into of financial arrangements with such courts and officials as provided for under the provisions of federal law and regulations. The local county attorney shall be considered the designee of the cabinet for purposes of administering the program of child support recovery within a county, subject to the option of the county attorney to decline such designation. Nothing in this section shall prevent the secretary from taking such action, with prior written notice, as appropriate if the terms and conditions of the cooperative agreement are not met. When a cooperative agreement with a contracting official is canceled for good cause, the cabinet may not offer that cooperative agreement to that official during the official’s tenure.

Where the local county attorney, friend of the court, domestic relations agent, or other designee of the cabinet has been contracted for the purpose of administering child support enforcement pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, the contracting official shall be deemed to be representing the cabinet and as such does not have an attorney-client relationship with the applicant who has requested services pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act nor with any dependent on behalf of the individuals for whom services are sought.

The cabinet shall determine the name of each obligor who owes an arrearage of at least two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). After notification to the obligor owing an arrearage amount of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), the cabinet shall transmit to the United States secretary of health and human services the certified names of the individuals and supporting documentation for the denial, revocation, or limitation of the obligor’s passport. The cabinet shall notify the identified obligor of the determination and the consequences and provide an opportunity to contest the determination.

The cabinet shall determine the name of an obligor owing an arrearage and shall indefinitely deny, suspend, or revoke a license or certification that has been issued if the person has a child support arrearage that equals or exceeds the amount that would be owed after six (6) months of nonpayment or fails, after receiving appropriate notice, to comply with subpoenas or warrants relating to paternity or child support proceedings as provided by 42 U.S.C. sec. 666(a)(16).

The cabinet shall forward the name of the individual to a board of licensure or board of certification for the notification of the denial, revocation, or suspension of a driver’s license, professional license or certification, occupational license or certification, recreational license, or sporting license.

The denial or suspension shall remain in effect until the child support arrearage has been eliminated or payments on the child support arrearage are being made in accordance with a court or administrative order, the person complies with the subpoena or warrant relating to paternity or child support proceedings, or the appeal of the denial or suspension is upheld and the license is reinstated.

Except for cases administered by the cabinet under 42 U.S.C. secs. 651 et seq. which shall be afforded the appeal process set forth by KRS 405.450(3), an individual who has a license or certification denied, revoked, or suspended shall have the right to appeal to the licensing or certifying board.

A dispute hearing shall be conducted by the cabinet in accordance with KRS 405.450. The only basis for a dispute hearing shall be a mistake in fact.

The cabinet shall in its discretion enter into agreements with financial institutions doing business in the Commonwealth to develop and operate, in coordination with the financial institutions, a data match system as required by KRS 205.772 to 205.778.

The cabinet may issue both intrastate and interstate administrative subpoenas to any individual or entity for financial or other information or documents that are needed to establish, modify, or enforce a child support obligation pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. secs. 651 et seq. An administrative subpoena lawfully issued in another state to an individual or entity in this state shall be honored and enforced in the Circuit Court of the county in which the individual or entity resides.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall forward to the Office of the Attorney General a list of names of delinquent obligors and, in cooperation with the Office of the Attorney General, shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement KRS 15.055.

The cabinet shall compare a quarterly report provided by the Finance and Administration Cabinet of all tort claims made against the state by individuals with the child support database to match individuals who have a child support arrearage and may receive a settlement from the state.

The cabinet shall prepare and distribute to the cabinet’s designee for the administration of the child support program information on child support collections and enforcement. The information shall include a description of how child support obligations are:

Established;

Modified;

Enforced;

Collected; and

Distributed.

The cabinet’s designee for the administration of the child support program shall distribute, when appropriate, the following:

Information on child support collections and enforcement; and

Job listings posted by employment services.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 411, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 330, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 365, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 255, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 220, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 37, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 430, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 266, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 21, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2012, ch. 158, § 30, effective July 12, 2012; 2018 ch. 112, § 10, effective July 14, 2018.

205.713.
Standardized forms for entry of state case registry information.

All forms, child support orders, wage withholding orders, or orders amending an existing child support order, entered in any case in Circuit Court, District Court, or family court that require entry into the state case registry under KRS 205.712(4) shall be entered on forms adopted by the Administrative Office of the Courts after consultation with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. If the provisions of a child support order are contained in an order that is narrative in nature, the adopted forms shall be used in addition to the narrative order.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 430, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 267, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 112, § 13, effective July 14, 2018.

205.715.
Debt due and owing to state by parents.

The payment of public assistance to or on behalf of a dependent child shall create a debt due and owing the state by the parent or parents of the child. If a court has ordered child support incident to a final divorce decree or other final order for child support, the debt shall be limited to the amount specified in the decree or order.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 343, § 3; 1978, ch. 277, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 411, § 3, effective July 15, 1988.

205.720.
Assignment — Subrogation — Distribution of child support payments — Effect of termination of Title IV-D services.

By applying for Title IV-D services or accepting public assistance for or on behalf of a needy dependent child, the recipient shall be deemed to have made an assignment to the cabinet of the right to any child support or maintenance owed up to the amount of public assistance paid by the cabinet to the recipient, including amounts which have accrued at the time the assignment is made between October 1, 1997, and September 30, 2000. The cabinet shall be subrogated to the right of the child or the person having custody to collect and receive all child support payments and to initiate any support action existing under the laws of this state.

The cabinet shall distribute all child support payments and assigned arrearages as required by 42 U.S.C. secs. 651 et seq.

When Title IV-D services on behalf of a dependent child are terminated, current and past due court-ordered or administratively determined child support owed the child shall be payable to the physical custodian of the dependent child for the period of time the dependent child was in the physical custody of that custodian.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 343, § 4; 1978, ch. 277, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1994, ch. 330, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 255, § 6, effective July 15, 1998.

205.721.
Title IV-A services available to individuals not receiving public assistance benefits — Continuation of IV-D services — Fee for services — Exemption — Annual fee.

All services available to individuals receiving public assistance under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act benefits shall also be available to individuals not receiving public assistance benefits, upon application by the individual with the cabinet.

The cabinet shall continue to provide IV-D services when a family ceases to receive public assistance without requiring a formal application and without payment of the application fee specified in subsection (3) of this section. IV-D services shall be discontinued upon the request of the recipient.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the cabinet may charge an application fee for the services based on a fee schedule, which shall take into account the applicant’s net income. No application fee shall be required from individuals receiving public assistance.

The cabinet shall impose an annual fee of thirty-five dollars ($35) pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 654, which shall be satisfied by withholding the fee from a child support disbursement.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 379, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 487, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 418, § 12, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 100, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 255, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2008, ch. 21, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2019 ch. 162, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

205.725.
Action when application received by cabinet — Definition.

Whenever the cabinet receives an application for public assistance on behalf of a needy dependent child or reviews the records of those currently receiving public assistance on behalf of a needy dependent child and it appears to the satisfaction of the cabinet that either or both parents have failed to provide support to the child, the cabinet may take appropriate action under this chapter, or any other appropriate state and federal laws and regulations, to assure that the responsible parent or parents provide support to the child.

As used in KRS 205.730, 205.735, 205.765 and 205.785, the term “child” includes a child of an individual who is not receiving public assistance and who is eligible to receive child support services in accordance with Title IV-D of the Social Security Act.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 343, § 5; 1978, ch. 277, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 487, § 3, effective July 15, 1986.

205.730.
Cabinet’s duty to locate custodial and noncustodial parents — Enforcement of child support obligations — Registry of information relating to parents — Assistance from governmental agencies — Limits on availability of information.

Unless the cabinet has reason to believe allegations of child abuse or domestic violence and that the disclosure of the information could be harmful to the custodial parent or the child of the parent, the cabinet shall attempt to locate a noncustodial parent of a child described in KRS 205.725, and establish or set an amount of modification, and enforce the child support obligation.

Upon the request of a putative father and for the purpose of establishing paternity only, the cabinet shall attempt to locate a custodial parent of a child described in KRS 205.712 if the cabinet finds the action to be in the best interest of the child.

If paternity is established for a child described in KRS 205.725 as a result of the location of the custodial parent, the cabinet shall establish a child support obligation or a modification for a child support obligation and shall enforce the child support obligation if the cabinet finds the enforcement of the order to be in the best interest of the child.

The cabinet shall serve as a registry for the receipt of information which directly relates to the identity or location of absent parents, and, upon request of a putative father, the location of a custodial parent, in order to establish paternity, to answer interstate inquiries concerning deserting parents or custodial parents, to coordinate and supervise any activity on a state level in search of an absent parent or custodial parent, to develop guidelines for coordinating activities of any governmental agency in providing information necessary for location of absent parents or custodial parents, to obtain information on the location of parents to enforce state and federal laws against parental kidnapping and to make or to enforce a child custody or visitation order, and is to process all requests received from an initiating county or an initiating state which has adopted the Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act or the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.

In order to carry out responsibilities imposed under this chapter, the cabinet may request information and assistance from any governmental agency. All state, county, and city agencies, officers, and employees shall cooperate with the cabinet in determining the location of parents who have abandoned or deserted children and shall cooperate with the cabinet in determining the location of custodial parents for the purpose of establishing paternity with all pertinent information relative to the location, income and assets, property, and debt of the parents, notwithstanding any provision of state law making the information confidential.

The information which is obtained by the cabinet shall only be available to such governmental agency or political subdivision of any state for purposes of locating an absent parent to enforce the parent’s obligation of support and for the purposes of location of custodial parents to establish paternity of putative fathers.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 343, § 6; 1978, ch. 277, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1994, ch. 330, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 255, § 8, effective July 15, 1998.

205.732.
Employment assistance program for low-income noncustodial parents.

The cabinet shall, to the extent federal funding is available, establish a statewide program to help low-income, noncustodial parents find and keep employment. The goal of the program shall be to reduce welfare payments by helping participants become financially responsible for their children. The cabinet shall involve local social service providers and state and local government agencies, and may provide incentives to employers who hire program participants. The program shall also encourage noncustodial parents to be actively involved in their children’s lives. Noncustodial parents may be required to enroll in the program by court order.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 430, § 4, effective July 14, 2000.

205.735.
Information to be supplied by employer.

All business concerns doing business in this state, to the extent that they have employees working within this state, or maintain personnel files within this state, or are incorporated under the laws of this state, shall provide the cabinet with the following information upon certification by the secretary that the information is for the purpose of locating a parent, and the establishment, modification, and enforcement of a child support and medical support order, and that the information obtained will be treated as confidential information by this cabinet or the agency or cabinet of any other state which administers the Child Support Enforcement Program pursuant to Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act for the other state: full name, Social Security account number, date of birth, home address, wages, and number of dependents listed for tax purposes.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 343, § 7; 1978, ch. 277, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 411, § 4, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 255, § 9, effective July 15, 1998.

205.740.
Assignment of wages to satisfy support obligation. [Repealed.]

205.741.
Assignment of wages to satisfy support obligation — Notice of withholding. [Repealed.]

205.743.
Service of withholding order on employer or debtor. [Repealed.]

205.744.
Employment information of obligor to be furnished to cabinet. [Repealed.]

205.745.
Child support lien or levy in favor of cabinet — Filing of notice — Foreclosure actions — Immobilization of vehicles of child support obligors.

A child support lien or levy in favor of the cabinet shall be enforceable against all real and personal property of the obligor if he has failed to make child support payment in an amount equal to support payable for one (1) month and the child support has been assigned to the cabinet. In accordance with subsection (4) of this section, the lien or levy shall have first priority over any other lien assigned by any other agency, association, or corporation.

The cabinet shall file a notice of lien or levy with the county clerk of any county or counties in which the obligor has interest in property and the notice shall be recorded in the same manner as notices of lis pendens. The recordation shall constitute notice of both the original amount of child support due and all subsequent amounts due by the same obligor. Upon request, an authorized agent of the cabinet shall disclose the specific amount of liability to any interested party legally entitled to the information. The notice, when so filed, shall be conclusive to all persons of the lien or levy on the property having legal situs in that county. The lien or levy shall commence as to property of the obligor located in the Commonwealth at the time the notice is filed and shall continue until the original amount of child support due and any subsequent amounts, including interest, penalties, or fees, are fully paid. The lien or levy shall attach to all interest in real and personal property in the Commonwealth, then owned or subsequently acquired by the obligor. The clerk shall be entitled to a fee pursuant to KRS Chapter 64.

The cabinet may force the sale of the property of the parent subject to the lien or levy for the payment of assigned child support, and distribute the proceeds in accordance with 42 U.S.C. secs. 651 et seq.

The cabinet’s lien or levy shall be superior to any mortgage or encumbrance created after the notice of lien or levy is recorded. The cabinet shall give full faith and credit to child support liens or levies created in other states without requirement of judicial notice or proceedings prior to enforcement, but the liens or levies shall subordinate to any child support lien or levy of the cabinet that relates to the same obligor and property.

The cabinet shall not enforce the lien by foreclosure action on a principal residence of an obligor if to do so would deprive a minor child of the obligor of a homestead, unless the failure to enforce the lien by foreclosure would result in the loss of the home of the minor child of the custodial parent.

In the event another lienholder initiates a foreclosure action against the property of the obligor, the cabinet may protect its interest in the property by filing an answer counterclaim and cross-claim and participate in the proceeds of any sale of the property as its interests may appear.

The cabinet shall notify the obligor of the filing of its claim of lien or levy and the opportunity to contest and appeal the action in accordance with the requirements of KRS Chapter 13B.

Liens or levies resulting from actions provided by this section shall be inapplicable to an account maintained at a financial institution that is or may be subject to the data match system established by KRS 205.774, and is subordinate to any prior lien, levy, or security interest perfected by a financial institution or other legitimate lien or levy holder.

The cabinet may, after application to and approval of the Circuit Court, enforce the lien by the immobilization with vehicle boots of a vehicle registered in the obligor’s name. The cabinet shall establish procedures for vehicle booting by the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A. The procedures shall require that the following conditions are verified before a vehicle is immobilized with a vehicle boot:

There is an arrearage that equals or exceeds six (6) months without payment;

The obligor has failed, after receiving appropriate notice, to comply with subpoenas or warrants relating to child support proceedings;

A lien has been filed in the county where the vehicle is kept;

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shows that the vehicle identification number for the vehicle to be booted is registered in the obligor’s name;

The vehicle to be booted is solely owned by the obligor, co-owned by the obligor and current spouse, or owned by a business in which the obligor is the sole proprietor;

A notice of intent has been sent to the obligor, unless there is reason to believe that the obligor will leave town or hide the vehicle;

The obligor does not contact the cabinet within ten (10) days of notice to negotiate a settlement; and

A target date is set for booting.

The administrative regulations shall also require that the cabinet send a cancellation notice to the obligor and the sheriff if a decision is made to terminate the booting of a vehicle. Once a vehicle has been booted, the cabinet shall attempt to reach a payment agreement with the obligor including terms for the release of the vehicle. If an agreement is not reached with the obligor, the cabinet may proceed with the sale of the vehicle. If the cabinet sells a vehicle, the cabinet shall notify the Department of Vehicle Regulation to issue clear title to the new owner of the vehicle.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 343, § 9; 1978, ch. 384, § 342, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 379, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 487, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 411, § 8, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 418, § 13, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 255, § 10, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 221, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 430, § 6, effective July 14, 2000.

205.750.
Payments to be made through the state agency or the agency’s designee.

Child support payments made pursuant to a court order shall be made through the state agency or an agency designated by the state agency to receive payments and paid to the cabinet upon notice by the cabinet to the court and the obligor that the child is a recipient of services pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act.

Payment of support payments by the obligor directly to a child who is receiving public assistance after the obligor has been notified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section does not abate the obligor’s support obligation to the cabinet.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 343, § 10; 1978, ch. 277, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 487, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 411, § 9, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 417, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

205.752.
Penalty imposed upon payor for tender of dishonored check.

If any check tendered to the cabinet is not paid when presented to the drawee bank for payment, there shall be paid as a penalty by the payor who tendered the check, or the payor for whom the check was tendered, upon notice and demand of the cabinet, an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the check. The penalty under this section shall not be less than ten dollars ($10) or more than twenty-five dollars ($25). If the payor who tendered the check shows to the cabinet’s satisfaction that the failure to honor payment of the check resulted from error by parties other than the payor, the cabinet shall waive the penalty.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 417, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

205.755.
Manner for receipt and distribution of payments.

Any payments of support made on behalf of a needy dependent child who is receiving public assistance shall be deposited by the cabinet in a manner prescribed by the secretary which is consistent with state and federal law and regulations. Distribution of any payments so made shall be made in a manner prescribed by the secretary which is consistent with state and federal law and regulations.

The cabinet may establish a system to receive and process all child support payments using automated payment options including, but not limited to, telephone and personal computer payment methods.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 343, § 11; 2000, ch. 430, § 7, effective July 14, 2000.

205.760.
Suit to recover money due dependent child. [Repealed.]

205.765.
Judicial proceeding to secure support.

The cabinet may appear in any judicial proceeding on behalf of the dependent child in order to secure support for the child from his parent or parents.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 343, § 13.

205.766.
Concurrent jurisdiction of Circuit and District Courts in certain child support cases.

For purposes of KRS 205.710 to 205.800, KRS Chapter 403, and KRS Chapter 407, the Circuit Court and the District Court shall have concurrent jurisdiction to establish, modify, and enforce obligations of child support in cases where the determination of paternity is not an issue, except that the jurisdiction of the District Court in cases not involving the determination of paternity shall be limited to those cases where there is no Circuit Court order of this state previously setting child support.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 417, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

205.767.
Surety to guarantee payment of overdue support.

The cabinet shall require a parent in appropriate cases to give security, post bond, or give some other guarantee to secure payment of overdue support.

The cabinet shall provide advance notice to the obligor regarding the delinquency of the support payment and the requirement of posting security, bond or guarantee. The obligor shall be notified of his rights and methods available to contest the impending action in compliance with due process of law and administrative regulations.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 478, § 7, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 411, § 10, effective July 15, 1988.

205.768.
Release of information to consumer reporting agencies — Notice — Charge for information.

The cabinet shall periodically make information available to consumer reporting agencies regarding the amount of overdue support owed by a parent. Amounts may be reported by the cabinet to the certified consumer reporting agency.

The cabinet shall provide advance notice to the obligor concerning the proposed release of the information to the certified consumer reporting agency and inform the obligor of the methods available to contest the accuracy of the information in compliance with due process of law.

The cabinet may charge the certified consumer reporting agency a fee not to exceed the actual cost of providing the information.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 487, § 8, effective July 15, l986; 1988, ch. 411, § 11, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 255, § 11, effective July 15, 1998.

205.7685.
Credit report from consumer reporting agency requested for purpose of child support recovery.

The cabinet shall request information from a certified consumer reporting agency only when a full credit report is needed for the purpose of establishing a parent’s capacity to make child support payments, determining the appropriate levels of child support payments, or enforcing a child support order, award, agreement, or judgment.

The report will be kept confidential and be used solely for the purpose of establishing an individual’s capacity to make child support payments or determining the appropriate level of the payments.

The report will not be used in connection with any other civil, administrative, or criminal proceeding or for any other purpose.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 255, § 40, effective July 15, 1998; 2016 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.